apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="got/owy__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ow</l>        <r>owy<s n="adj"/></r></p><!-- BASE__nowy' was replaced --><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ów</l>        <r>owy<s n="adj"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owo</l>       <r>owy<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pew/ny__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ny<s n="adj"/></r></p><!-- BASE__nowy' was replaced --><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ien</l>       <r>ny<s n="adj"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>no</l>        <r>ny<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="peł/ny__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>ny<s n="adj"/></r></p><!-- BASE__nowy' was replaced --><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>en</l>        <r>ny<s n="adj"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>no</l>        <r>ny<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="dzisiej/szy__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>szy<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>szo</l>       <r>szy<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="inn/y__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><!-- BASE__nowy' was replaced --><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__zły">
  <e>       <p><l>zł</l>        <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źli</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źli</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="/zły__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>zły<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__zły"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zło</l>       <r>zły<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__dorosły">
  <e>       <p><l>sł</l>        <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śli</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śli</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="doro/sły__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sły<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__dorosły"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sło</l>       <r>sły<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__jasny">
  <e>       <p><l>sn</l>        <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śni</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śni</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ja/sny__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sny<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__jasny"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sno</l>       <r>sny<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="przyja/zny__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>zn</l>        <r>zny<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źni</l>       <r>zny<s n="adj"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źni</l>       <r>zny<s n="adj"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zno</l>       <r>zny<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__szósty">
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r></r></p><par n="PBASE__pierwszy"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ści</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ści</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="czwar/ty__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ty<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><!-- BASE__czwarty' was replaced --><par n="BASE__wzięty"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="szó/sty__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sty<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><par n="BASE__szósty"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ósm/y__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>y<s n="det"/><s n="ord"/></r></p><!-- BASE__ósmy' was replaced --><par n="BASE__kochany"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="czy/sty__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>sty<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__szósty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sto</l>       <r>sty<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="żół/ty__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ty<s n="adj"/></r></p><!-- BASE__czwarty' was replaced --><par n="BASE__wzięty"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>to</l>        <r>ty<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gorąc/y__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>y<s n="adj"/></r></p><par n="BASE__będący"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>y<s n="adj"/><s n="cpd"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__czytaj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>my</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cie</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>że</l>        <r><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>myż</l>       <r><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cież</l>      <r><s n="imp"/><s n="emph"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="BASE__czytałem">
  <e>       <p><l>łem</l>       <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łam</l>       <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łeś</l>       <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łaś</l>       <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ł</l>         <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ła</l>        <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ło</l>        <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>liśmy</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>liśmy</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>liście</l>    <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>liście</l>    <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>li</l>        <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>li</l>        <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łyśmy</l>     <r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łyście</l>    <r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ły</l>        <r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łbym</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łabym</l>     <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łbyś</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łabyś</l>     <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łby</l>       <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łaby</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łoby</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>libyśmy</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>libyście</l>  <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>liby</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łybyśmy</l>   <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łybyście</l>  <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>łyby</l>      <r><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dwudziesty">      <i>dwudzie</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dwutysięczny"><p><l>dwutysiączn</l><r>dwutysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e lm="dziesiąty">       <i>dziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="dziewiąty">       <i>dziewią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="dziewiętnasty">   <i>dziewiętna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e lm="inny">            <i>inn</i><par n="inn/y__det"/></e>
<e lm="osiemdziesiąty">  <i>osiemdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="osiemnasty">      <i>osiemna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="ośmiotysięczny"><p><l>osiemtysięczn</l><r>ośmiotysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e lm="pięćdziesiąty">   <i>pięćdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="setny">           <i>setn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e lm="siedemnasty">     <i>siedemna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e lm="sześciotysięczny"><i>sześciotysięczn</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e lm="sześćdziesiąty">  <i>sześćdziesią</i><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="szósty">          <i>szó</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e lm="trzynasty">       <i>trzyna</i><par n="szó/sty__det"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="trzytysięczny"><p><l>trzytysiączn</l><r>trzytysięczn</r></p><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e>                      <re>[0-9]+</re><i>n</i><par n="ósm/y__det"/></e>
<e>                      <re>[0-9]+</re><par n="czwar/ty__det"/></e>
<e lm="zły">             <i></i><par n="/zły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ciasny">          <i>cia</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dorosły">         <i>doro</i><par n="doro/sły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dzisiejszy">      <i>dzisiej</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gotowy">          <i>got</i><par n="got/owy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="iglasty">         <i>igla</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jednolity">       <i>jednoli</i><par n="żół/ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="jutrzejszy">      <i>jutrzej</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="liściasty">       <i>liścia</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lotniczy">        <i>lotnicz</i><par n="gorąc/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="niezły">          <i>nie</i><par n="/zły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="niejasny">        <i>nieja</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nieusunięty">     <i>nieusunię</i><par n="żół/ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nowoczesny">      <i>nowocze</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oczywisty">       <i>oczywi</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="parzysty">        <i>parzy</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pewny">           <i>pew</i><par n="pew/ny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pełny">           <i>peł</i><par n="peł/ny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="pieszy">          <i>pie</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="porywczy">        <i>porywcz</i><par n="gorąc/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="powyższy">        <i>powyż</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="przyjazny">       <i>przyja</i><par n="przyja/zny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="późniejszy">      <i>później</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="radosny">         <i>rado</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rozmaity">        <i>rozmai</i><par n="żół/ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="soczysty">        <i>soczy</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stanowczy">       <i>stanowcz</i><par n="gorąc/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tutejszy">        <i>tutej</i><par n="dzisiej/szy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="współczesny">     <i>współcze</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wygasły">         <i>wyga</i><par n="doro/sły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wyrazisty">       <i>wyrazi</i><par n="czy/sty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wzniosły">        <i>wznio</i><par n="doro/sły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="zazdrosny">       <i>zazdro</i><par n="ja/sny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="zdrowy">          <i>zdr</i><par n="got/owy__adj"/></e>
<e lm="znakomity">       <i>znakomi</i><par n="żół/ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ścisły">          <i>ści</i><par n="doro/sły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="śledczy">         <i>śledcz</i><par n="gorąc/y__adj"/></e>
<e lm="żelazny">         <i>żela</i><par n="przyja/zny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="zwięzły">         <i>zwię</i><par n="/zły__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nieprzyjazny">    <i>nieprzyja</i><par n="przyja/zny__adj"/></e>
<e lm="wyśmienity">      <i>wyśmieni</i><par n="żół/ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dziewiczy">       <i>dziewicz</i><par n="gorąc/y__adj"/></e>
